playground.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Ӄ Л Ԓ М Н Ӈ О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к ӄ л ԓ м н ӈ о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ʼ

 %{T%}:т %{T%}:0
! %{т%}:т %{т%}:0
! %{E%}:э %{t%}:а
 %{N%}:ӈ %{N%}:г %{N%}:н %{N%}:м
 %{и%}:и %{и%}:э %{и%}:0
! %{R%}:т  %{R%}:р
 %{R%}:р %{R%}:н
 %{Æ%}:а %{Æ%}:э %{Æ%}:е %{Æ%}:0

! %{к%}:к %{к%}:г
! %{e%}:э %{e%}:г
 %{ы%}:ы %{ы%}:0 %{ы%}:ъ
 %{G%}:й %{G%}:э %{G%}:г
 %{I%}:и %{I%}:й

! %{ъ%}:ъ %{ъ%}:0

 %{·%}:0         ! Stem-final vowel deletion
 %{°%}:0         ! Stem-final vowel reduction
 %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}:0       ! Dominant vowel harmony

 %→:0            ! Incorporation boundary
 %>:0            ! Morpheme boundary
 %{☭%}:0         ! Trigger for loan word phonology
  ;

Sets

Vow   = А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я %{Æ%}
        а е ё и о у ы э ю я ;

Yot = Е е Ё ё Ю ю Я я ;

Cns   = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Ӄ Л Ԓ М Н Ӈ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ! Ъ Ь ʼ
        б в г д ж з й к ӄ л ԓ м н ӈ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ; ! ъ ь ;

Dominant = А О Я Ё
           а о я ё ;

Coronal = Т Н Й Ч Р Ԓ
          т н й ч р ԓ ;

Glottal = ʼ Ъ Ь ъ ь ;

Nasal = М Н Ӈ
        м н ӈ ;

Anterior = П Т С Ч М Н В
           п т с ч м н в ;

Alveolar = Т Н Р С Ч Ԓ Л
           т н р с ч ԓ л ;

Bilabial = П М В
           п м в ;

Back = К Ӄ Ӈ Г
       к ӄ ӈ г ;

! this is not actually a set that i'm going to use, just descriptive
! Archiphonemes = Æ ! this is the э that is recessive and may be turned to а
!                T ! latin; erg & com т or 0
!                G ! first in all & abl
!                ;

Rules

"Vowel harmony"
! а й в а н >:0 у:о
Vx:Vy <=> [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] :* _ ;
                                    _ :* [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] ;
       except
           .#. _ %>: :Vow ;         ! contexts for deletion
          :Cns _ :0* %>: :Vow ;     ! deletion; :0* = special symbols
               _ :* \ %>: %{☭%}: ;  ! doesn't affect loan phonology
               _ %{°%}:0 .#. ;          ! word-final abs reduction
               _ %{·%}:0 .#. ; ;        ! word-final abs deletion
   [ :ч | :ԓ ] :0* _ ;       ! orthography
       where
           Vx in ( у ю и %{Æ%} )
           Vy in ( о ё э   а   ) matched ;


"Vowel harmony after ԓ"
! а й в а ԓ >:0 у:ё
! а й в а ԓ >:0 у:о   ! Neg
Vx:Vy <=> [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] :* :ԓ :0* _ ;
                                    :ԓ :0* _ :* [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] ;
      except
          .#. _ %>: :Vow ;
         :Cns _ :0* %>: :Vow ;
              _ :* \ %>: %{☭%}: ;
              _ %{°%}:0 .#. ;
              _ %{·%}:0 .#. ; ;
      where
          Vx in ( у ю и %{Æ%} )
          Vy in ( ё ё е   я   ) matched ;

!
"Vowel harmony after ч"
! о ч >:0 {Æ}:а
! о ч >:0 и:е
Vx:Vy <=> [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] :* :ч :0* _ ;
                                     :ч :0* _ :* [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] ;
       except
           .#. _ %>: :Vow ;
          :Cns _ :0* %>: :Vow ;
               _ :* \ %>: %{☭%}: ;
               _ %{°%}:0 .#. ;
               _ %{·%}:0 .#. ; ;
       where
           Vx in ( у ю и %{Æ%} )
           Vy in ( о ё е   а   ) matched ;

!
"Vowel harmony for Æ (recessive)"
! {Æ}:э ю:ю п ы ч ь >:0 у:у
%{Æ%}:э <=>  _ ;
      except
        [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] :* _ ;
                                   _ :* [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] ;
                               .#. _ %>: :Vow ;
                              :Cns _ :0* %>: :Vow ;
                                   _ %{°%}:0 .#. ;
                                   _ %{·%}:0 .#. ; ;
        [ :ч | :ԓ ] :0* _ ;

!
"Vowel harmony for Æ (recessive) after palatal"
! п р и ч {☭}:0 >:0 {Æ}:е
%{Æ%}:е <=> [ :ч | :ԓ ] :0* _ ;
      except
        [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] :* _ ;
                                   _ :* [ Dominant | %{⁺ⱽᴴ%}: ] ;
                               .#. _ %>: :Vow ;         ! contexts for deletion
                              :Cns _ :0* %>: :Vow ;
                                   _ :* \ %>: %{☭%}: ;
                                   _ %{°%}:0 .#. ;
                                   _ %{·%}:0 .#. ; ;


"Vowel deletion for recessive"                    ! because syllable structure
! {Æ}:0 >:0 а г н о т в а н >:0 к {Æ}:а
! а г н о т в а н о {☭}:0 >:0 у:о >:0 к ы н
! г а н >:0 у:о >:0 о
V:0 <=> .#. _ %>: :Vow ;
       :Cns _ :0* %>: :Vow ;
       except
           :Cns _ :0* %>: [ V: | :Vd ] %>: ;     ! for one-vowel suffixes
            %>: _ :0* %>: [ V: | :Vd ] ;
       where
           V in ( е и у ю %{Æ%} )
           Vd in ( я э о ё а ) matched ;


"Vowel deletion for dominant"                    ! because syllable structure
! а г н о т в а:0 >:0 у:о
V:0 <=> .#. _ %>: [ :Vow - :V ] ;       ! same as for rec but can be written shorter
       :Cns _ :0* %>: [ :Vow - :V ] ;
       where
           V in ( я э о ё а ) ;


"Epenthesis"
! а й в а >:0 {ы}:0 к
! г {ы}:ы р >:0 {ы}:ы к
! м ы т {ы}:0 >:0 г {ы}:ы р >:0 {ы}:0 м ы к
! м {ы}:ы >:0 к ы ԓ е >:0 {ы}:0 к
%{ы%}:ы <=> [ :Cns | .#. ] :0* [ :Cns | :Glottal ] :0* _ :0* :Cns ;       ! first syll/three cns in a row, after the second
            :Cns :0* _ :0* :Cns :0* [ :Cns | .#. ] ;       ! last syll/three cns in a row, after the first
       :Vow :Cns :0* %>: %{G%}: _ ;


"Epenthesis for yot"
! м ы т {ы}:ъ >:0 я р >:0 {ы}:0 м ы к
%{ы%}:ъ <=> [ Cns - :ԓ ] :0* _ :0* :Yot ;


"t insertion after vowel-final stems"
! г {Æ}:0 >:0 а й в а >:0 {T}:т {Æ}:а
! г {Æ}:0 >:0 а г т а ч г >:0 {T}:0 {Æ}:а
%{T%}:т <=> Vow :0* %>: _ ;


"All/Abl allomorph г-"
! а й в а >:0 {G}:г т ы {⁺ⱽᴴ}:0
%{G%}:г <=> Vow Cns :0* %>: _ ;
                    :0* %>: _ т ;
        except
                Cns :0* %>: _ т ;


"All/Abl allomorph э-"
! а г ъ ё л я т к э г ы р г >:0 {G}:э {ы}:0 п ы {⁺ⱽᴴ}:0
%{G%}:э <=> Cns Cns :0* %>: _ ;
                Cns :0* %>: _ т ;


"Abl allomorph й-"
! а й в а >:0 {G}:й {ы}:0 п ы {⁺ⱽᴴ}:0
%{G%}:й <=> Vow :0* %>: _ ;
        except
                :0* %>: _ т ;               ! this line turns off Allative


"{и} in suffixes incl. after non-coronals"
! а г н о т в а н в >:0 {ы}:ы т {и}:0
! а й в э р э т >:0 {ы}:0 т {и}:э
%{и%}:0 <=> [ :Cns - :Coronal ] :0* %{ы%}: т _ ;
                                               :Vow %>: _ ;


"Stem-final vowel deletion"
! ч а й к о к а:0 {·}:0
V:0 <=>  _ %{·%}:0 .#. ;
        where
            V in Vow ;

! "Stem-final vowel reduction"
! г о п ӄ а:ы {°}:0
! V:ы <=>  _ %{°%}:0 .#. ;
!        where
!             V in Vow ;


"N allomorph г"
!
%{N%}:г <=> _ :0* [ :Nasal & :Anterior ] ;
      except
            :г :0* _ ;

"N allomorph н"
! %{Æ%}ʼйӈ%{Æ%}выткун%{Æ%}%{N%}%{Æ%}
! й ы %{N%}:ӈ %{ы%}:ы р
! й ы %{N%}:н %{ы%}:0 р >:0 у
%{N%}:н <=> :г :0* _ ;
               _ :0* [ :Alveolar - :Nasal | :й ] ;
               _ :0* .#. ;

"N allomorph м"
%{N%}:м <=> _ :0* [ :Bilabial - :Nasal ];
      except
            :г :0* _ ;

"п assimilation"
! в а т а п:м >:0 {ы}:0 н а
п:м <=> _ :0* :Nasal ;
      except
            _ [ : - %>: ]* %{☭%}: ;

"т assimilation"
! в а р а т:н >:0 {ы}:0 н а
т:н <=> _ :0* :Nasal ;
      except
            _ [ : - %>: ]* %{☭%}: ;

"р allophone t"
! и:э ԓ и:е р:т >:0 {ы}:0 н а
р:т <=> _ :0* :Coronal ;
      except
            _ [ : - %>: ]* %{☭%}: ;

"k allophone q"
к:ӄ <=> _ :0* ӄ ;
      except
            _ [ : - %>: ]* %{☭%}: ;


"q deletion"
ӄ:0 <=> _ :0* [ Cns - :ӄ ] ;
      except
            .#. _ ;


"й allophone г"
! к и ԓ в %{Æ%}:э й
! к и:э ԓ в %{Æ%}:а й:г >:0 {ы}:0 н а
й:г <=> _ :0* :Coronal ;
      except
            _ [ : - >: ]* %{☭%}: ;


"гм -> ӈӈ first"
г:ӈ <=> _ :0* м: ;

"гм -> ӈӈ second"
м:ӈ <=> г: :0* _ ;

"I to й in stative"
%{I%}:й <=> :Vow :0* _ ;

"R that is р"
%{R%}:р <=> .#. _ ;
